Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4790.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 17033. (1) Notwithstanding the requirements of part 161, the board may require a licensee physician seeking renewal of a license to furnish the board with satisfactory evidence that during the 3 years immediately preceding application for renewal the licensee physician has attended continuing education courses or programs approved by the board totaling not less than 150 hours in subjects related to the practice of medicine including, but not limited to, medical ethics and designed to further educate licensees.physicians. (2) As required under section 16204, the board shall promulgate rules requiring each applicant for license renewal to complete as part of the continuing education requirement of subsection (1) an appropriate number of hours or courses in pain and symptom management. (3) The board shall ensure that a continuing education course or program on women's midlife health is available to a physician that the physician may complete as part of the continuing education requirement of subsection (1). A course or program described in this subsection must include materials on communication and physician preparedness in the management of menopause symptoms and related chronic conditions. The board shall inform physicians of courses or programs under this subsection and encourage physicians to complete a course or program described in this subsection as part of the continuing education requirement of subsection (1). Sec. 17533. (1) Notwithstanding the requirements of part 161, the board may require a licensee physician seeking renewal of a license to furnish the board with satisfactory evidence that during the 3 years immediately preceding an application for renewal the licensee physician has attended continuing education courses or programs approved by the board and totaling not less than 150 hours in subjects related to the practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery and designed to further educate licensees.physicians. (2) As required under section 16204, the board shall promulgate rules requiring each applicant for license renewal to complete as part of the continuing education requirement of subsection (1) an appropriate number of hours or courses in pain and symptom management. (3) The board shall ensure that a continuing education course or program on women's midlife health is available to a physician that the physician may complete as part of the continuing education requirement of subsection (1). A course or program described in this subsection must include materials on communication and physician preparedness in the management of menopause symptoms and related chronic conditions. The board shall inform physicians of courses or programs under this subsection and encourage physicians to complete a course or program under this subsection as part of the continuing education requirement of subsection (1).